South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S149.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  This act may be cited as the "South Carolina Juvenile Justice Reform Act". SECTION 2.  Section 63-1-20 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 63-1-20. (A) A children's policy is hereby established for this State. (B) This policy shall be interpreted in conjunction with all relevant laws and regulations and shall apply to all children who have need of services including, but not limited to, those mentally, socially, emotionally, physically, developmentally, culturally, educationally or economically disadvantaged or handicapped, those dependent, neglected, abused or exploited and those who by their circumstance or action violate the laws of this State and are found to be in need of treatment or rehabilitation. (C) It shall be the policy of this State to concentrate on the prevention of children's problems as the most important strategy which can be planned and implemented on behalf of children and their families. The State shall encourage community involvement in the provision of children's services including, as an integral part, local government, public and private voluntary groups, public and private nonprofit groups and private-for-profit groups in order to encourage and provide innovative strategies for children's services. To maximize resources in providing services to children in need, all agencies providing services to children shall develop methods to coordinate their services and resources. For children with multiple needs, the furtherance of this policy requires all children's services agencies to recognize that their jurisdiction in meeting these children's needs is not mutually exclusive. (D) When children or their families request help, state and local government resources shall be utilized to compliment community efforts to help meet the needs of children by aiding in the prevention and resolution of their problems.  The State shall direct its efforts first to strengthen and encourage family life as the most appropriate environment for the care and nurturing of children.  To this end, the State shall assist and encourage families to utilize all available resources.  For children in need of services, care, and guidance the State shall secure those services as are needed to serve the emotional, mental, and physical welfare of children and the best interests of the community, preferably in their homes or the least restrictive environment possible.  When children must be placed in care away from their homes, the State shall insure that they are protected against any harmful effects resulting from the temporary or permanent inability of parents to provide care and protection for their children.  It is the policy of this State to reunite the child with his family in a timely manner, whether or not the child has been placed in the care of the State voluntarily.  When children must be permanently removed from their homes, they shall be placed in adoptive homes so that they may become members of a family by legal adoption or, when adoption is not appropriate, in the legal guardianship of relatives or fictive kin to preserve family connections, or absent that possibility, other permanent settings. (E) It shall be the policy of this State that the primary goal of the juvenile justice system is to provide for any child who comes within the jurisdiction of the family court with the care and guidance as will secure his physical, emotional, moral, and mental well-being as well as to provide for the safety and security of the child and the community as a whole. It is the intent of the General Assembly to promote a system that will impose accountability for violations of the law, while also providing the treatment, rehabilitation, and education that will equip our children with the ability to live responsible and productive lives, preferably in the child's own home. These policies seek to guarantee due process of law in every proceeding, through which all interested parties are assured fair hearings at which legal rights are recognized and enforced. Above all, this chapter shall be liberally construed to reflect that the paramount juvenile justice policy of this State is to ensure the best interests of children who fall within the family court's jurisdiction. To accomplish these goals, juvenile justice policies shall be designed and construed to recognize that the ultimate solutions to juvenile crime must be family-based and community-centered. The policy implementation must protect the public safety and support the strengthening of families and educational institutions. Policies must facilitate efficient and effective cooperation, coordination, and collaboration among agencies of the local, state and federal government; be outcome-based, allowing for the effective and accurate assessment of program performance; and encourage public and private partnerships to address community risk factors. The General Assembly also recognizes that placing children in state custody is associated with higher rates of repeat offenses and negative outcomes for the child. It is, therefore, the intent of the General Assembly to preserve and strengthen family relationships, countenancing the removal of a child from his home only when it is essential to protect the child. Whenever the court places children in state custody or requires children to participate in community-based interventions, every effort shall be made to ensure these removals or interventions are supported by researched evidence and are mindful of and influenced by research into the effects of trauma, mental health disorders, and other factors on children's development and rehabilitation. (F) The children's policy provided for in this chapter shall be implemented through the cooperative efforts of state, county and municipal legislative, judicial and executive branches, as well as other public and private resources. Where resources are limited, services shall be targeted to those children in greatest need. (F)(G) In order to carry out this policy each agency, department, institution, committee, and commission which is concerned or responsible for children shall submit as a part of its annual budget request a listing of programs and services for children, the priority order of these programs and services in relation to other services, if any, that are provided by the agency, department, institution, committee, or commission, and a summary of the expenses incurred for the administration of its children's services and programs. In addition, each agency, department, institution, committee, and commission which must submit pursuant to law an annual report to the General Assembly shall include as part of the report a comprehensive statement of how its children's services and programs contributed to the implementation of this policy. Copies of all these budget requests and annual reports must be provided to the Office of the Governor by the agency, department, institution, committee, or commission. SECTION 3.  Chapter 19, Title 63 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Article 6 Juvenile Offender Civil Citations Section 63-19-700. Each circuit solicitor must establish a juvenile offender civil citation program to provide a civil alternative to criminal prosecution for eligible children who have committed acts of delinquency as set forth in this article. The Juvenile Offender Civil Citation Program shall be coordinated by a statewide civil citation coordinator within the Department of Juvenile Justice and shall include assessment and intervention services that a child voluntarily agrees to complete in lieu of formal custody and prosecution. Section 63-19-710. A law enforcement officer having probable cause to believe that a child has committed or attempted to commit an eligible offense of delinquency may refer an eligible child to the Juvenile Offender Civil Citation Program through the issuance of a civil citation. The issuance of a civil citation shall be at the discretion of the law enforcement officer and limited to qualified child offenders. Participation in the Juvenile Offender Civil Citation Program is voluntary on the part of the child offender. Referral to the Juvenile Offender Civil Citation Program shall be made with the consent of the victim if one exists, however, ultimate discretion to admit the child remains with the solicitor's office. The parent or guardian of the child may refuse the child's participation at any time. Section 63-19-720. (A) A child is eligible to participate in a civil citation program only if he is alleged to have committed an eligible offense. An allegation of the commission of an ineligible offense in addition to an eligible offense precludes participation in the program. An eligible offense includes all alleged offenses except: (1) any violent offense as defined by Section 16-1-60; (2) any offense that may be classified as an A, B, C, or D felony; and (3) any offense involving allegations of harassment or stalking, involving a firearm, or of failure to stop for a blue light. (B) For the purposes of this article, an "eligible child offender" means a child who meets both of the following: (1) no prior adjudication of delinquency, and (2) no prior referral to the Juvenile Offender Civil Citation Program or any other diversion program unless more than one year has elapsed since the first referral and the prior referral was for a different offense. (C) A law enforcement officer who chooses not to refer an otherwise eligible child to a civil citation program must provide the reason or reasons for the lack of the referral on a report provided to the program administrator within ten business days from the date the child was taken into custody. The officer must provide the justifications with reasonable specificity for each instance. Section 63-19-730. (A) A civil citation provided to the child shall include a description of the offense alleged to have been committed; contact information for the designated civil citation program; notification that the child must contact the identified civil citation program within seven business days to schedule their intake and initial assessment; and a warning that failure to contact and to participate with the identified civil citation program may result in the child's detention and the commencement of delinquency proceedings as otherwise provided in this chapter. (B) At the time of issuance of a civil citation by the law enforcement officer, the law enforcement officer shall advise the child that the child has the option to refuse the civil citation and instead be taken into custody and be subject to the jurisdiction of the family court and prosecution as otherwise provided in this chapter. Upon issuance of a civil citation, the law enforcement officer shall submit the civil citation to the appropriate juvenile civil citation program administrator. (C) A child issued a civil citation shall contact the identified civil citation program office within seven business days or as otherwise directed in the civil citation and thereafter report to the identified program office to which the child is referred. (D) Program administrators shall assess referred children using an approved risk assessment tool and may recommend the child to participate in counseling, treatment, community service, or other interventions appropriate to the needs of the child as identified by the assessment. (E) Upon successful completion of all terms and conditions of the Juvenile Offender Civil Citation Program, the child shall be discharged without detention. (F) If the child fails to comply with any requirements of the Juvenile Offender Civil Citation Program, including any assessments or required services, or otherwise violates any terms or conditions imposed by the program, then the child shall be unsuccessfully discharged from the Juvenile Offender Civil Citation Program. The civil citation program administrator shall serve notice upon on the child to appear before the family court and shall advise the referring law enforcement officer of a child's unsuccessful termination from the program. If the child is not able to be served by the program administrators, then the officer, upon receiving notice that the child to whom they have issued a civil citation has been unsuccessfully discharged from the Juvenile Offender Civil Citation Program, shall be authorized to take the child into custody or serve notice to appear before the family court and to commence delinquency proceedings as otherwise provided in this chapter. (G) The solicitor's office and program administrators may not impose a fee for participation in the program. (H) Participation in the Juvenile Offender Civil Citation Program shall not, with respect to a subsequent detention, serve to disqualify or otherwise preclude a child from participating in any diversion program at the discretion of the circuit solicitor. Section 63-19-740. Final discretion regarding the eligibility of program participants remains with the program administrators who may waive requirements of victim consent or failure to contact the office within the required time periods if it is in the best interest of the child to do so. Section 63-19-750. The Department of Juvenile Justice shall maintain a database of program participants for the purpose of identifying eligibility and overall program statistics. Specific information pertaining to each participant is confidential and not subject to disclosure under the Freedom of Information Act unless otherwise provided for by law. Any necessary information shall be disclosed to law enforcement, civil citation program offices, circuit solicitor's offices, or the Attorney General's office for the purposes of establishing eligibility of participants, or may be disclosed by court order. The results of the offender's participation in the program shall be disclosed to the victim of the offense if one exists. Generalized program statistics, data, and information that do not identify a specific program participant are not considered confidential under this subsection. SECTION 4.  Section 16-17-425 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 16-17-425. (A) It is unlawful for a student of a school or college in this State to make threats to take the life of or to inflict bodily harm upon another commit an act of mass violence at a school, college, or school-or college-sponsored activity by using any form of communication whatsoever. As used in this section, "an act of mass violence" means an act that a reasonable person would conclude could lead to serious bodily injury or death to two or more people. (B) A person who violates subsection (A) is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, must be fined not more than two thousand dollars or imprisoned for not more than one year, or both. (B)(C) Nothing contained in this section may be construed to repeal, replace, or preclude application of any other criminal statute. SECTION 5.  Section 16-23-430 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 16-23-430. (A) It shall be unlawful for any person, except state, county, or municipal law enforcement officers or personnel authorized by school officials, to carry on his person, while on any elementary or secondary school property, a knife, with a blade over two inches long, a blackjack, a metal pipe or pole, firearms firearm, or any other type of weapon, device, or object which may be used with the intent by the person to inflict serious bodily injury or death. (B) It shall be unlawful for any person, except state, county, or municipal law enforcement officers or personnel authorized by school officials, to carry on his person, while on any elementary or secondary school property a weapon, device, or object with the intent to inflict bodily injury. (B)(C) This section does not apply when the weapon remains inside an attended or locked motor vehicle and is secured in a closed glove compartment, closed console, closed trunk, or in a closed container secured by an integral fastener and transported in the luggage compartment of the vehicle. (C)(D) A person who violates the provisions of this section is guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, must be fined not more than one thousand dollars or imprisoned not more than five years, or both. A person who violates the provisions of subsection (B) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, must be fined not more than one thousand dollars or imprisoned for not more than one year, or both. Subsection (B) is a lesser-included offense of subsection (A). Any weapon or object used in violation of this section may be confiscated by the law enforcement division making the arrest. SECTION 6.  Section 63-1-40(6) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (6) "Status offense" means any offense which would not be a misdemeanor or felony if committed by an adult, such as, but not limited to, incorrigibility (beyond the control of parents), truancy, or running away, playing or loitering in a billiard room, playing a pinball machine or gaining admission to a theater by false identification. SECTION 7.  Section 63-3-520 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 63-3-520.  (A) The magistrate courts and municipal courts of this State have concurrent jurisdiction with the family courts for the trial of persons under seventeen eighteen years of age charged with traffic violations or violations of the provisions of Title 50 relating to fish, game, and watercraft when these courts would have jurisdiction of the offense charged if committed by an adult. (B) The family court shall report to the Department of Motor Vehicles all adjudications of a juvenile child for moving traffic violations and other violations that affect the juvenile's child's privilege to operate a motor vehicle including, but not limited to, controlled substance and alcohol violations as required by other courts of this State pursuant to Section 56-1-330 and shall report to the Department of Natural Resources adjudications of the provisions of Title 50. SECTION 8.  Section 63-7-310 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 63-7-310.  (A) The following persons must report in accordance with this section when, in such person's professional capacity, he has received information that gives him reason to believe that a child has been or may be abused or neglected as defined in Section 63-7-20:  a physician, nurse, dentist, optometrist, medical examiner, or coroner, or an employee of a county medical examiner's or coroner's office, or any other medical, emergency medical services, mental health, or allied health professional, member of the clergy including a Christian Science Practitioner or religious healer, clerical or nonclerical religious counselor who charges for services, school teacher, counselor, principal, assistant principal, school attendance officer, social or public assistance worker, substance abuse treatment staff, or childcare worker in a childcare center or foster care facility, foster parent, police or law enforcement officer, juvenile justice worker, undertaker, funeral home director or employee of a funeral home, persons responsible for processing films, computer technician, judge, and a volunteer non-attorney guardian ad litem serving on behalf of the South Carolina Guardian Ad Litem Program or on behalf of Richland County CASA. (B) If a person required to report pursuant to subsection (A) has received information in the person's professional capacity which gives the person reason to believe that a child's physical or mental health or welfare has been or may be adversely affected by acts or omissions that would be child abuse or neglect if committed by a parent, guardian, or other person responsible for the child's welfare, but the reporter believes that the act or omission was committed by a person other than the parent, guardian, or other person responsible for the child's welfare, the reporter must make a report to the appropriate law enforcement agency. (C) A person, as provided in subsections (A) and (B), who reports child abuse or neglect to a supervisor or person in charge of an institution, school, facility, or agency is not relieved of his individual duty to report in accordance with this section. The duty to report is not superseded by an internal investigation within the institution, school, facility, or agency. (D) Except as provided in subsection (A), a person who has reason to believe that a child's physical or mental health or welfare has been or may be adversely affected by abuse or neglect may report, and is encouraged to report, in accordance with this section. A person, as provided in subsection (A) or (B), who reports child abuse or neglect to a supervisor or person in charge of an institution, school, facility, or agency is not relieved of his individual duty to report in accordance with this section. The duty to report is not superseded by an internal investigation within the institution, school, facility, or agency. (E) Reports of child abuse or neglect may be made orally by telephone or otherwise to the county department of social services or to a law enforcement agency in the county where the child resides or is found. (F) Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring a person under the age of eighteen to be a mandated reporter pursuant to subsection (A). (G) A person required to report pursuant to subsection (A) or (B) is not required to report when employed by a lawyer who is providing representation in a criminal, delinquency, civil, or family law matter, and the basis for the suspicion arises in the course of that representation. SECTION 9.  Section 63-19-20(9) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (9) "Status offense" means an offense which would not be a misdemeanor or felony if committed by an adult including, but not limited to, incorrigibility or beyond the control of parents, truancy, or running away, playing or loitering in a billiard room, playing a pinball machine, or gaining admission to a theater by false identification. SECTION 10. Chapter 19, Title 63 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Article 2 Children's Bill of Rights Section 63-19-100. A child in the care and custody of a state, county, municipal or regional institutional facility for the detention of children or for the treatment and rehabilitation of children within this State has the right: (1) to be treated with basic human dignity and respect, without intentional infliction of humiliation; (2) to have fair and equal access to services, placement, care, treatment, and benefits; (3) to a program of education that meets the requirements of law and is appropriate for the developmental maturity of the child; (4) to receive adequate, healthy, and appropriate food; (5) to receive adequate, appropriate and accessible basic necessities, including, without limitation, shelter, clean clothing, and personal hygiene products and facilities; (6) to have access to necessary medical and behavioral health care services, including, without limitation: (a) dental, vision, and mental health services; (b) medical and psychological screening, assessment and testing; and (c) referral to, and receipt of, medical, emotional, psychological or psychiatric evaluation and treatment as soon as practicable after the need for such services has been identified; (7) to be free from: (a) abuse or neglect, as defined in Section 63-7-20(6); (b) corporal punishment, except the reasonable use of force that is necessary to preserve the order, security or safety of the child, the public, the staff of the facility or other children who are detained in the facility; (c) discrimination or harassment on the basis of his or her actual or perceived race, ethnicity, ancestry, national origin, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, mental or physical disability, or exposure to any communicable disease; (d) the deprivation of food, sleep, exercise, education, pillows, blankets, or personal hygiene products as a form of punishment or discipline; (e) searches for the purpose of harassment or as a form of punishment or discipline; or (f) restrictions from a daily shower, clean clothing, drinking water, a toilet, or reading materials relating to the education as a form of punishment or discipline; (8) to have reasonable access and accommodations to participate in religious services of his or her choice when reasonably available on the premises of the facility or to refuse to participate in religious services; (9) to communicate with other persons, including, without limitation, the right: (a) to have regular contact through visits, telephone calls and mail with: (i) parents; (ii) guardians; (iii) siblings; (iv) biological or adoptive children; (v) attorneys; and (vi) other adults with whom the child has established a familial or mentoring relationship, including, without limitation, clergy, caseworkers, teachers, mentors and other persons, upon approval of the facility; (b) to communicate confidentially with: (i) any agency which provides child welfare services to the child concerning his or her care; (ii) attorneys, legal services organizations, and their employees or staff; (iii) ombudspersons and other advocates; (iv) members of the clergy; and (v) holders of public office, and people who work at a state or federal court; Except as otherwise provided by specific statute, a communication made pursuant to this subsection is not a privileged communication. (c) to report any alleged violation of his or her rights pursuant to Section 63-19-130 without being threatened or punished; and (10) to receive information concerning his or her rights set forth in this title. Section 63-19-110. A detention facility shall: (1) inform the child of his or her rights as set forth in Section 63-19-100; (2) provide the child with a written copy of those rights; (3) provide an additional written copy of those rights to the child upon request; (4) to the extent that it is practicable, provide a written copy of those rights to the parent or guardian of the child; and (5) post a written copy of the rights set forth in Section 63-19-100 in a conspicuous place inside the facility. Section 63-19-120. An institutional facility may impose reasonable restrictions on the time, place, and manner in which a child may exercise his or her rights set forth in Section 63-19-100 if such restrictions are necessary to preserve the order, security or safety of the child, the public, the staff of the facility, or other children who are held in the facility. Section 63-19-130. If a child believes that any of his or her rights set forth in Section 63-19-100 have been violated, the child may raise and redress a grievance through, without limitation: (A) a member of the staff of the facility; (B) a probation officer or parole officer; (C) an agency which provides child welfare services to the child, and any employee thereof; (D) a juvenile court with jurisdiction over the child; (E) a guardian ad litem for the child; (F) an attorney for the child; or (G) the Department of Children's Advocacy. SECTION 11. Article 1, Chapter 19, Title 63 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 63-19-210.     (A) Prior to any custodial interrogation by law enforcement of any child fifteen years of age or younger, the law enforcement officer or official must arrange for the child to consult with legal counsel either in person, by telephone, or by video conference. The consultation must be made before any request for the child to waive his Miranda rights. The consultation may not be waived. (B) The court shall, in adjudicating the admissibility of any statements of a child fifteen years of age or younger made during or after a custodial interrogation, consider the effect of the failure to comply with subdivision (A). (C) This section does not apply if both of the following criteria are met: (1) the officer who questions the child reasonably believes the information sought is necessary to protect life or property from an imminent threat, and (2) the officer's questions are limited to those questions that are reasonably necessary to obtain that information. (D) This section does not apply to a probation officer in the normal performance of his duties. SECTION 12. Section 63-19-340 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 63-19-340. An annual report of the department must be prepared by the director which shall include an account of all funds received and expended, persons served by the department including a report of the state and condition of the correctional institutions, and community programs operated by the department. The annual report must include: (1) the total number of: (a) offenses referred to the Department; (b) the top ten most frequent offenses referred to the Department; (c) status offenses referred to the Department; (d) probation violation or contempt of court charges referred to the Department following one or more adjudications for a status offense; (e) misdemeanor referrals; (f) probation violation or contempt of court charges referred to the Department following an adjudication for one or more misdemeanors; (g) non-violent felony referrals; (h) probation violation or contempt of court charges referred to the Department following an adjudication for one or more non-violent felonies; (i) violent offenses as defined in Section 16-1-60; and (j) probation violation or contempt of court charges referred to the Department following an adjudication for one or more violent offenses as defined in Section 16-1-60; and (2) the number of cases in each category listed in subitems (1)(c) through (1)(j) associated with the following outcomes: (a) cases which are dismissed or diverted; (b) cases in which a child is detained pre trial, separately counting children detained in the Department's custody and children detained in a facility operated by another state or local government entity; (c) adjudications after which a child is placed on probation; (d) adjudications after which a child is ordered to undergo a community evaluation; (e) adjudications after which a child is committed to the Department's custody for a residential evaluation; (f) adjudications after which a child is committed to the Department for a determinate sentence; (g) adjudications after which the Department places a child in an alternative placement; and (h) adjudications after which the child is committed to the Department for an indeterminate period of time; (3) the Department must also provide the totals of each category specified in subsections (1) and (2) broken down by the sex and race of the child; and (4) the number of individual children placed in corrective room restriction while in the Department's custody, the number of corrective room restrictions imposed (including multiple restrictions placed on an individual child), the average and median length of time children were placed in corrective room restriction, and the number of corrective room restrictions which lasted for seventy-two consecutive hours or more. SECTION 13. Section 63-19-350 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 63-19-350. The department shall provide community services as the director shall assign to it which shall include, but are not limited to: (1) family court intake screening and referral counseling; (2) serving, advising, and counseling children placed on probation by the family court; (3) serving, advising, and counseling children in institutions as may be necessary for the placement of the children in a proper environment after release and for the placement of children in suitable jobs where necessary and proper; (4) supervising and guiding children released or conditionally released from institutions; (5) counseling children released or conditionally released from its commitment facilities; (6) coordinating the activities of supporting community agencies which aid in the social adjustment of children released from its commitment facilities; (7) providing or arranging for necessary services leading to the rehabilitation of delinquents either within the department or through cooperative arrangements with other appropriate agencies; (8) providing counseling and supervision for a child under twelve years of age who has been adjudicated delinquent or convicted of a crime or who has entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere, when other suitable personnel is not available and upon request of the court; (9) providing detention screening services when a child is taken into custody for violation of a law or ordinance as provided for in this chapter; (10) providing prevention services including short- and long-range planning, establishing statewide priorities and standards, developing public awareness programs, and providing technical assistance to local government in the development of prevention programs; (11) developing secure and nonsecure alternatives to jail; (12) providing a variety of community-based programs to augment regular probation services including, but not limited to, volunteer services, restitution, community-work programs, family counseling, and contract probation with specific sanctions for various types of behavior; (13) providing a variety of community-based programs to serve as alternatives to institutions including, but not limited to, halfway houses, work release, intensive supervision services, restitution, forestry and wilderness camps, marine science programs, and other residential and nonresidential programs; (14) providing programs to divert juveniles, where proper and appropriate, from the juvenile justice system; (15) juveniles must be assigned to intensive probation or aftercare services by the Department of Juvenile Justice. Juveniles assigned to these intensive supervision services must be those juveniles who require enhanced supervision, monitoring and contacts, or a higher level of treatment services. Intensive supervision must be provided by the department in all regions of the State. In conjunction with establishing these intensive supervision services, the department shall develop an array of graduated sanctions and impose these sanctions on offenders being provided intensive supervision services for technical rule violations and minor infractions, whenever feasible to do so, in lieu of re-incarceration of the juvenile in a secure correctional facility. The array of graduated sanctions developed by the department may include, as a condition of probation or parole, placement of a juvenile in a staff or environmentally secure residential program. Case workers selected to monitor, supervise, and serve juveniles assigned to intensive supervision services shall have caseloads of no more than twenty juveniles. (16) developing and utilizing structured decision-making tools at all key points in the juvenile justice process, to include detention, diversion, disposition, and release from commitment. SECTION 14. Section 63-19-360(3) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (3) establishing and maintaining residential and nonresidential reception and evaluation centers at which all children committed to its custody by a circuit or family court must be received, examined, and evaluated before assignment to one of its institutions or before other disposition or recommendation is made concerning the child. The commitment of a child to a reception and evaluation center or youth correctional institution of the department may be made only after the child has been adjudicated delinquent. The evaluation conducted by the reception and evaluation centers includes, but is not limited to: (a) a complete comprehensive, individualized biopsychosocial assessment to include an examination of the child's social, physical, psychological, and mental health functioning examination; (b) an investigation and consideration of family and community environment and other facts in the background of the person concerned that might relate to the person's delinquency; (c) a determination of the correctional rehabilitative or custodial care that would be most appropriate. The department shall create facilities and employ personnel as will that enable the centers to conduct the necessary physical, mental, and psychological examinations and assessments required by this section; SECTION 15. Article 3, Chapter 19, Title 63 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 63-19-362. When a delinquency petition alleging that a child has committed an offense which would be a misdemeanor that would carry a maximum term of imprisonment of less than five years if committed by an adult and the offense occurred while the child was in the custody of the Department, then the petition must include information that shows the Department has sought to resolve the expressed problem through available administrative approaches, the child has not responded to such approaches and continues to engage in delinquent behavior, and court intervention is needed. SECTION 16. Chapter 19, Title 63 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 63-19-365. (A) As used in this section, (1) "solitary confinement" means physical and social isolation in a room or cell for twenty-two hours per day or more. (2) "corrective room restriction" means the confinement of a child to a room as a protective action and includes, without limitation: (a) administrative seclusion; (b) behavioral room confinement; (c) corrective room rest; and (d) room confinement. (B) No child shall at any time be held in solitary confinement. (C) A child who is held in a state, county, municipal or regional institutional facility for the detention of children or for the treatment and rehabilitation of children may be subjected to corrective room restriction only if all other less-restrictive options have been exhausted and only for the purpose of ensuring the safety of the child, staff or others or ensuring the security of the facility. (D) A child must only be subjected to corrective room restriction for the minimum time required to address the unsafe behavior and the child must be returned to the general population of the facility as soon as reasonably possible. (E) Any action that results in corrective room restriction for more than two hours must be documented in writing and approved by a supervisor. (F) The facility shall conduct a safety and well-being check on a child subjected to corrective room restriction at least once every ten minutes while the child is subjected to corrective room restriction. (G) A child who is subjected to corrective room restriction for more than twenty-four hours must be provided: (1) not less than one hour of out-of-room, large muscle exercise each day, including, without limitation, access to outdoor recreation if weather permits; (2) access to the same meals and medical and mental health treatment, the same access to contact with parents or legal guardians, and the same access to legal assistance and educational services as is provided to children in the general population of the facility; (3) any other interaction or services necessary to prevent a violation of Subsection (B); and (4) a review of the corrective room restriction status at least once every twenty-four hours. If, upon review, the corrective room restriction is continued, then the continuation must be documented in writing, including, without limitation, an explanation as to why no other less-restrictive option is available. (H) The facility shall not subject a child to corrective room restriction for more than seventy-two consecutive hours. (I) Each county, municipal, regional, or state institutional facility for the detention of children or for the treatment and rehabilitation of children shall report monthly to the Department of Children's Advocacy the number of children who were subjected to corrective room restriction during that month and the length of time that each child was in corrective room restriction. Any incident that resulted in the use of corrective room restriction for seventy-two consecutive hours must be addressed in the monthly report, and the report must include the reason or reasons any attempt to return the child to the general population of the facility was unsuccessful. SECTION 17. Section 63-19-370 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 63-19-370. (A) The department may enter into agreements with the governing bodies of other state departments or institutions for the purpose of effecting a more efficient and economical management of any institution or program under its supervision. The department is authorized to make contracts and expend public funds as required to carry out the functions prescribed for it in this chapter within the limits of appropriated funds. (B) The department may establish agreements with the Department of Education, the Department of Mental Health, individual school districts, and other state and local departments specific to reentry services for children returning to schools and communities after being in the department's custody, including, but not limited to, mental health counseling, mentoring programs, and educational support services. Programs, resources, and services provided under such agreements shall be accessible to students if they are needed while under supervision by the Department and for a reasonable time after supervision has concluded. All revenues generated from United States Department of Agriculture grants, the Education Finance Act, the Detention Center, and Medicaid federal funding may be retained, carried forward, and expended by the Department of Juvenile Justice, in accordance with applicable regulations, for the costs associated with related programs. SECTION 18. Chapter 19, Title 63 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 63-19-500. (A) At least one pre-detention intervention program shall be established in each judicial circuit in the state to provide services to children in all counties in that circuit for the purpose of offering an alternative to referral to the juvenile justice system for children who commit first-time, non-violent as defined in Section 16-1-70, delinquent acts. Each program shall be available to serve all eligible children in each county in that circuit, and no child shall be required to pay program fees. These programs must divert eligible children from initial contact with the juvenile justice system using approaches that are evidence-based, culturally relevant, trauma-informed, developmentally appropriate, and that promote long-term success for children. (B) The department shall develop a plan for the establishment, implementation, and oversight of pre-detention diversion programs around the state to which all first-time, non-violent offenders must be referred. The department shall provide competitively awarded funding to at least one such program in each judicial circuit to supplement other funding received by the program. Programs receiving funding from the department must adhere to the standards and procedures for such programs developed by the department, which must include requirements for applicants, organizational characteristics, reporting and auditing criteria, and such other standards for eligibility and accountability, and funding shall be based on the number of children served and such other requirements as may be established by the department. Pre-detention diversion programs may incorporate some or all of the following: educational services, including academic and vocational services; mentoring services; mental health services; and behavioral health services. (C) A law enforcement officer who takes a child into custody for a non-violent offense as defined in Section 16-1-70 shall utilize a database system provided by the department to review the child's criminal history with the juvenile justice system. If the child has no prior referral to the department, then the law enforcement officer must refer the child to the local pre-detention diversion program for that circuit utilizing a referral form provided by the department, and must provide a copy of the referral form to the child's parent or guardian, the department, and the entity designated to run the pre-detention diversion program. (D) If a referral to the juvenile justice system is received for a first-time non-violent offender, then the referral shall not be accepted and shall be returned to the referral source with instructions to refer the child to the entity designated to run the pre-detention diversion program in that respective circuit. (E) All records of a child's referral to and participation in a pre-detention diversion program must be kept separate from records of children referred to the juvenile justice system. A referral to a pre-detention diversion program is not a referral to the juvenile justice system, and accordingly, must not be reflected on a child's criminal history. (F) Each pre-detention diversion program shall submit data to the department on at least an annual basis which identifies for each child participating in the diversion program: (1) the race, ethnicity, gender, and age of that child; (2) the alleged offense committed, including the statute number of the offense; (3) the county in which the offense was committed and the law enforcement agency that had contact with the child for the offense; and (4) other information as specified by the department. SECTION 19.Article 3, Chapter 19, Title 63 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 63-19-520. (A) There is hereby established in the department's budget the Juvenile Justice Improvement Fund. All expenditures from the Juvenile Justice Improvement Fund shall be for the development, implementation, or monitoring of community-based diversion or intervention programs, practices, and services for children and their families that reduce youth risk factors and rates of recidivism. The Department shall at least annually transfer into the Juvenile Justice Improvement Fund available state general recurring funds identified as savings as a result of decreased reliance on out of home placement of youth. (B) The department shall create a plan to incentivize the development of a continuum of evidence-based community intervention programs and services for children under supervision of the department. These programs and services shall serve to divert children from further involvement with the juvenile justice system. Intervention programs may incorporate some or all of the following: educational services, including academic and vocational services; mentoring services; mental health services; and behavioral health services. Funding prioritization shall be given to community-based intervention programs that provide services to counties that demonstrate a high rate of out of home placement of children and that have few existing community-based alternatives. (C) The department may contract with a service coordination agency or agencies to assist the department with building a continuum of community-based services for children and families across the state. Among other services, a service coordination agency may provide referral processing, billing, reporting, monitoring of the quality of direct service providers, monitoring of evidence-based programs for fidelity, completion of on-going service gaps analyses, filling of service gaps, assessment of existing treatment capacity, development of new treatment capacity, and selection of and subcontracting with direct service providers. SECTION 20. Section 63-19-810 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 63-19-810. (A) When a child found violating a criminal law or ordinance is taken into custody, the taking into custody is not an arrest. The jurisdiction of the court attaches from the time of the taking into custody. When a child is taken into custody, the officer taking the child into custody shall notify the parent, guardian, or custodian of the child as soon as possible.  Unless otherwise ordered by the court, the person taking the child into custody may release the child to a parent, a responsible adult, a responsible agent of a court-approved foster home, group home, nonsecure facility, or program upon the written promise, signed by the person, to bring the child to the court at a stated time or at a time the court may direct. The written promise, accompanied by a written report by the officer, must be submitted to the South Carolina Department of Juvenile Justice as soon as possible, but not later than twenty-four hours after the child is taken into custody. If the person fails to produce the child as agreed, or upon notice from the court, a summons or a warrant may be issued for the apprehension of the person or of the child. (B) When a child is not released pursuant to subsection (A), the officer taking the child into custody shall immediately notify the authorized representative of the Department of Juvenile Justice, who shall respond within one hour by telephone or to the location where the child is being detained. Upon responding, the authorized representative of the department shall review the facts in the officer's report or petition and any other relevant facts and advise the officer if, in his opinion, there is a need for detention of the child. The officer's written report must be furnished to the authorized representatives of the department and must state: (1) the facts of the offense; (2) the reason why the child was not released to the parent. Unless the child is to be detained, the child must be released by the officer to the custody of his parents or other responsible adult upon their written promise to bring the child to the court at a stated time or at a time the court may direct. However, if the offense for which the child was taken into custody is a violent crime as defined in Section 16-1-60, the child may be released only by the officer who took the child into custody. If the officer does not consent to the release of the child, the parents or other responsible adult may apply to any judge of the family court within the circuit for an ex parte order of release of the child. The officer's written report must be furnished to the family court judge. The family court judge may establish conditions for such release. (C) When a child is charged by a law enforcement officer for an offense which would be a misdemeanor or felony if committed by an adult, not including a traffic or wildlife violation over which courts other than the family court have concurrent jurisdiction as provided in Section 63-3-520, the law enforcement officer also shall notify the principal of the school in which the child is enrolled, if any, of the nature of the offense. This information may be used by the principal for monitoring and supervisory purposes but otherwise must be kept confidential by the principal in the same manner required by Section 63-19-2220(E). (D)(C) Juveniles A child may be held in nonsecure custody within the law enforcement center for only the time necessary for purposes of identification, investigation, detention, intake screening, awaiting release to parents or other responsible adult, or awaiting transfer to a juvenile detention facility or to the court for a detention hearing. A child seventeen years of age or older who has not been released to a parent, guardian, or responsible adult, must have a hearing before a magistrate or municipal court judge pursuant to Chapter 15, Title 17 as soon as practicable but not later than twenty-four hours from the time of being taken into custody. The judge shall order his release pending trial in the appropriate magistrate or family court, on his own recognizance without surety unless the court determines in its discretion that such a release does not reasonably assure the appearance of the child as required, or there is an unreasonable danger to the community or an individual. If the child is not released without surety, then the court must place his findings regarding his risk of danger or failure to appear in writing as part of the record. The judge, as a condition of release, shall require the child to appear before the family court at the next available date. Any conditions of release by the magistrate are not binding upon the family court who may review the conditions of bond de novo, and order detention, placement, or release of the child pursuant to Section 63-19-830. SECTION 21. Section 63-19-820 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 63-19-820. (A) When the officer who took the child into custody determines that placement of a juvenile child outside the home is necessary, the authorized representative of the Department of Juvenile Justice shall make a diligent effort to place the child in an approved home, program, or facility, other than a secure juvenile detention facility, when these alternatives are appropriate and available. (B) Pre-trial detention is authorized only when that is the least restrictive appropriate option available to prevent an unreasonable flight or public safety risk, taking into account the overall rehabilitative purposes of the juvenile justice system and the likely harm to children and to public safety from unnecessary detention, and the child's presumption of innocence. If a child is eligible for detention, then authorities should consider what alternatives to detention, if any, would mitigate any flight or public safety risk. A child is eligible for detention in a secure juvenile detention facility only if the child: (1) is charged with a violent crime as defined in Section 16-1-60; (2) is charged with a crime which, if committed by an adult, would be a felony or would carry a maximum term of imprisonment of five years or more; a misdemeanor other than a violent crime, and the child: (a) is already detained or on probation or conditional release or is awaiting adjudication in connection with another delinquency proceeding; (b) has a demonstrable recent record of wilful failures to appear at court proceedings; (c) has a demonstrable recent record of violent conduct resulting in physical injury to others;  or (d) has a demonstrable recent record of adjudications for other felonies or misdemeanors;  and (i) there is reason to believe the child is a flight risk or poses a threat of serious harm to others;  or (ii) the instant offense involved the use of a firearm; (3) is a fugitive from another jurisdiction; (4) requests protection in writing under circumstances that present an immediate threat of serious physical injury; (5)(4) had in his possession a deadly weapon; (6)(5) has a demonstrable recent record of wilful failure to comply with prior placement orders including, but not limited to, a house arrest order is court ordered to be detained; (7)(6) has exhausted suitable community-based alternative programs or placements, no suitable alternative placement and it is determined that detention is in the child's best interest or is necessary to protect the child or public, or both;  or (8) is charged with an assault and battery or an assault and battery of a high and aggravated nature on school grounds or at a school-sponsored event against any person affiliated with the school in an official capacity. (7) is charged with unlawful student threats pursuant to Section 16-17-425 or failure to stop for a blue light pursuant to Section 56-5-570. A Only a child who meets the criteria provided in this subsection is eligible for detention. Detention is not mandatory for a child meeting the criteria if that child can be supervised adequately at home or in a less secure setting or program. The use of secure detention shall be limited to a child who poses a current risk to public safety or is a current flight risk. If the officer does not consent to the release of the child, the parents or other responsible adult may apply to the family court within the circuit for an ex parte order of release of the child. The officer's written report must be furnished to the family court judge who may establish conditions for the release. (C) A child must not be detained in secure confinement if the child could not be committed to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice pursuant to Section 63-19-1450. The family court shall consider any past mental health, disability services, special education or similar records provided by any of the parties to determine if that section applies. A child considered not competent to stand trial by a competency evaluator is presumed to be ineligible for detention in secure confinement. (C)(D) No A child may must not be placed in secure confinement or ordered detained by the court in secure confinement in an adult jail or other place of detention for adults for more than six hours. However, the prohibition against the secure confinement of juveniles in adult jails does not apply to juveniles who have been waived to the court of general sessions for the purpose of standing trial as an adult. Juveniles A child placed in secure confinement in an adult jail during this six-hour period must be confined in an area of the jail which is separated by sight and sound from adults similarly confined. (D)(E) Temporary holdover facilities may hold juveniles children during the period between initial custody and the initial detention hearing before a family court judge for a period up to forty-eight hours, excluding weekends and state holidays. (E)(F) A child who is taken into custody because of a violation of law which would not be a criminal offense under the laws of this State if committed by an adult or because of a violation of a court order related to a status offense must not be placed or ordered detained in an adult or a juvenile detention facility. A child who is taken into custody because of a violation of the law which would not be a criminal offense under the laws of this State if committed by an adult must not be placed or ordered detained more than twenty-four hours in a juvenile detention facility, unless If an order previously has been issued by the court, of which the child has notice and which notifies the child that further violation of the court's order may result in the out-of-home placement secure detention of that child in a juvenile detention facility. If a juvenile is ordered detained for violating a valid court order, the juvenile child may not be held in secure confinement in a juvenile detention facility, but may be held in a group home, residential treatment facility, therapeutic foster care, crisis shelter, or other alternative nonsecure placement provided by the Department of Juvenile Justice when leaving the child outside of state custody will not reasonably protect the child or the public for not more than seventy-two hours, excluding weekends and holidays. However, nothing in this section precludes a law enforcement officer from taking a status offender into custody. (F)(G) Children ten years of age and younger must not be incarcerated in a jail or detention facility for any reason. Children eleven or twelve years of age who are taken into custody for a violation of law which would be a criminal offense under the laws of this State if committed by an adult or who violates conditions of probation for such an offense must may be incarcerated in a jail or juvenile detention facility only by order of the family court. (G)(H) For purposes of this section, "adult jail" or other place of detention for adults includes a state, county, or municipal police station, law enforcement lockup, or holding cell. "Secure confinement" means an area having bars or other restraints designed to hold one person or a group of persons at a law enforcement location for any period of time and for any reason. Secure confinement in an adult jail or other place of detention does not include a room or a multipurpose area within the law enforcement center which is not secured by locks or other security devices. Rooms or areas of this type include lobbies, offices, and interrogation rooms. Juveniles Children held in these areas are considered to be in nonsecure custody as long as the room or area is not designed for or intended for use as a residential area, the juvenile child is not handcuffed to a stationary object while in the room or area, and the juvenile child is under continuous visual supervision by facility staff while in this room or area which is located within the law enforcement center. Secure confinement also does not include a room or area used by law enforcement for processing "booking" purposes, irrespective of whether it is determined to be secure or nonsecure, as long as the juvenile's child's confinement in the area is limited to the time necessary to fingerprint, photograph, or otherwise "book" the juvenile child in accordance with state law. SECTION 22. Section 63-19-830(A) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (A) If the officer who took the child into custody has not released the child to the custody of the child's parents or other responsible adult, the court shall hold a detention hearing within forty-eight hours from the time the child was taken into custody, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays. At this hearing, the authorized representative of the department shall submit to the court a report stating the facts surrounding the case and a recommendation as to the child's continued detention pending the adjudicatory and dispositional hearings. The court shall appoint counsel for the child if none is retained. No child may proceed without counsel in this hearing, unless the child waives the right to counsel and then only after consulting at least once with an attorney. At the conclusion of this hearing, the court shall determine whether probable cause exists to justify the detention of the child and the appropriateness of, and need for, the child's continued detention. If continued detention of a juvenile child is considered appropriate by the court and if a juvenile detention facility exists in that county which meets state and federal requirements for the secure detention of juveniles children or if that facility exists in another county with which the committing county has a contract for the secure detention of its juveniles children and if commitment of a juvenile child by the court to that facility does not cause the facility to exceed its design and operational capacity, the family court shall order the detention of the juvenile child in that facility.  The family court may also order that the child be detained or remain detained in an approved home, program, or facility, other than a secure juvenile detention facility. A juvenile child must not be detained in secure confinement or in an approved home, program, or facility, other than a secure juvenile detention facility in excess of ninety days except in exceptional circumstances as determined by the court. A detained juvenile child is entitled to further and periodic review: (1) within ten days following the juvenile's child's initial detention hearing; (2) within thirty days following the ten-day hearing;  and (3) at any other time for good cause shown upon motion of the child, the State, or the department. If the child does not qualify for detention or otherwise require continued detention under the terms of Section 63-19-820(A) or (B), the child must be released to a parent, guardian, or other responsible person. SECTION 23. Section 63-19-1010 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 63-19-1010.  (A) The Department of Juvenile Justice shall provide intake and probation services for juveniles children brought before the family courts of this State and for persons committed or referred to the department in cooperation with all local officials or agencies concerned. The role and function of intake is to independently assess the circumstances and needs of children referred for possible prosecution in the family court. Recommendations by the department as to intake must be reviewed by the office of the solicitor in the circuit concerned, and the final determination as to whether or not the juvenile child is to be prosecuted in the family court must be made by the solicitor or by the solicitor's authorized assistant, consistent with subsection (C). Statements of the juvenile child contained in the department's files must not be furnished to the solicitor's office as part of the intake review procedure, and the solicitor's office must not be privy to these statements in connection with its intake review. (B) Where circumstances do not warrant prosecution in the discretion of the solicitor, the intake counselor shall offer referral assistance for services as appropriate for the child and family. In the event that a juvenile child is adjudicated to be delinquent or found by the family court to be in violation of the terms of probation, the intake counselor shall offer appropriate dispositional recommendations to the family court for its consideration and determination of the disposition of the case. (C)(1) A child brought before the family court or referred to the department for a status offense or an offense which would be a crime if committed by an adult shall be referred to a diversion program and not for prosecution if the following criteria are met: (a) the child has no prior adjudications; (b) the child has not been referred to a diversion program within the last twelve months; and (c) the child is not referred for a violent offense as defined in Section 16 1 60. (2) If the solicitor or solicitor's authorized assistant has good cause to believe that diversion is insufficient to meet the purposes of this chapter, then the solicitor or solicitor's authorized assistant may prosecute the child in family court. The petition shall include notice of the departure from the presumption of diversion and reasons for that departure. Upon motion of the child and upon a finding that no good cause exists, the family court may refer the child for diversion. SECTION 24. Section 63-19-1020 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 63-19-1020.  (A) The parent, guardian,  or custodian of a child, an official of a child welfare board, a public official charged by law with the care of the poor, the recognized agents of an agency, association, society, or institution, a person having knowledge or information of a nature which convinces the person that a child is delinquent or that a child, by reason of his own acts in accordance with this chapter, is subject to the jurisdiction of the court, any person who has suffered injury through the delinquency of a child, or an officer having an arrested child in charge, may institute a proceeding respecting the child. (B) Before the department may accept a referral for the status offenses of incorrigibility or runaway, or before a petition for the offenses of incorrigibility or runaway may be filed, the person or entity seeking to institute the proceeding first shall provide documentation indicating that the parent, guardian, or custodian and the child have made reasonable efforts to resolve the challenges confronting the family through participation in family counseling, pastoral counseling, parenting improvement classes, or other family therapy services. If no prior assistance has been sought, then the department shall refer the parent, guardian, or custodian to service providers in the family's community or provide services itself to assist the family. (C) The department may accept a referral for a school related offense and a petition may be filed for a school related offense if the child is: (1) charged with a felony offense, or (2) charged with a misdemeanor offense and the referring entity attaches documentation to the referral demonstrating that the child has three or more prior discipline referrals for related conduct within the prior six months for which the child received a school-based consequence and appropriate community referral for services. Discipline referrals for being tardy to class, voluntarily missing class, violating school policy regarding school identification, violating school dress code policy, refusing to obey instruction of school personnel, using profanity, using or possessing tobacco products or paraphernalia, and other minor student misconduct shall not count as prior discipline referrals for purposes of this section. The department shall not accept a referral for, and a petition shall not be filed for, a school-based misdemeanor offense unless documentation is provided by the referring entity that meets this criteria and further demonstrates that prior consequences, interventions, or community referrals instituted by the school have been attempted and proven unsuccessful. Any referral for a school-based offense must include a copy of the child's school disciplinary history for at least the current school year, including documentation of consequences instituted by the school for the alleged conduct being referred. Before filing of a petition for a school-based offense, consideration must be given to the school-based discipline or other consequences the child received for the alleged conduct subject to the petition. (D) In addition to the requirements of subsection (C), any school or school district in such a case must provide to the solicitor information regarding: (1) whether the child accused of an offense is a child with a disability pursuant to 20 U.S.C. section 1400 et seq., as and if amended, and Chapter 33, Title 59 of the South Carolina Code of Laws; (2) if the child is a child with a disability, whether a manifestation review determination pursuant to 20 U.S.C. section 1415(k)(1)(E), as and if amended, occurred and, if so, whether the child's conduct was determined to be a manifestation of the child's disability; (3) if the child's conduct was determined to be a manifestation of the child's disability, whether the school district followed the process set forth in 20 U.S.C. section 1415(k)(1)(F), as and if amended; and (4) any efforts by the school or school district to review the appropriateness of the child's current individualized education program (IEP), behavior intervention plan, compliance with Section 504 of the Federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973, as amended, and placement, and any modifications where appropriate. SECTION 25. Section 63-19-1030(C) and (D) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (C) Before the hearing of a case of a child, the judge shall may cause an investigation of all the facts pertaining to the issue to be made. The investigation, if ordered, shall consist of an examination of the parentage and surroundings of the child, the child's age, habits and history, and also shall include inquiry into the home conditions, habits and character of the child's parents or guardian, if that is necessary in the discretion of the court. In these cases the court, if advisable, shall cause the child to be examined as to the child's mentality mental health by a competent and experienced psychologist or psychiatrist who shall make a report of the findings. Before the hearing in the case of a child, if the child attends school, a report on the child must be obtained from the school which the child attends. The school officials shall furnish the report upon the request of the court or its probation counselor. The court, when it is considered necessary, shall cause a complete physical examination to be made of the child by a competent physician. SECTION 63-19-1030(D) OF THE S.C. CODE IS AMENDED TO READ: (D) In a any case where the delinquency proceedings may result in commitment to an institution in which the child's freedom is curtailed upon service of a petition under this chapter,, the child or the child's parents or guardian must be given written notice with particularity of the specific charge or factual allegations to be considered at the hearing. The notice must be given as soon as practicable and sufficiently in advance to permit preparation. The child or the child's parent or guardian also must be advised in the notice of their right to be represented by counsel and that, if they are unable to employ counsel, counsel will be appointed to represent them. In the hearing, the parent or guardian and child also must be expressly informed of their right to counsel and must be specifically required to consider whether they do or do not waive the right of counsel. SECTION 26.Chapter 19, Title 63 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 63-19-1050.  Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no child respondent in a case filed under this chapter may be charged a fee to participate in any diversion or intervention program, nor shall any child respondent be required to pay more than five hundred dollars in restitution as a requirement of any diversion or intervention program. An otherwise eligible child must not be denied admission into a diversion or intervention program for owing a restitution amount greater than five hundred dollars. SECTION 27.Chapter 19, Title 63 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 63-19-1070.  (A) Except where the petition alleges that the respondent has committed a violent offense, the court may at any time prior to an adjudication of the petition under Section 63-19-1410 and with the consent of the respondent order that the proceeding be adjourned in contemplation of dismissal. An adjournment in contemplation of dismissal is an adjournment of the proceeding, for a period not to exceed six months, with a view to ultimate dismissal of the petition in furtherance of justice. The court may provide such terms and conditions for such an order as the court finds appropriate, consistent with subsection (D). (B) An order adjourning a petition in contemplation of dismissal may be issued upon motion of any party, or on the court's own motion. Upon issuing such an order, the court must set forth its reasons on the record. (C) Upon motion of any party, or upon the court's own motion, the court may restore the matter to the calendar at any time during the pendency of the order. If the proceeding is not restored, then the petition is, at the expiration of the order, deemed to have been dismissed by the court in furtherance of justice. (D) Permissible terms and conditions of an adjournment in contemplation of dismissal order may include supervision by the Department of Juvenile Justice; a requirement that the respondent cooperate with a mental health, social services or other appropriate community facility or agency to which the respondent may be referred based on evidence available to the court or the Department of Juvenile Justice; payment of restitution orders determined by agreement of the parties or consistent with the procedures of Section 63-19-1410(A)(3) not to exceed five hundred dollars, or other conditions agreed to by the parties; and a requirement that the respondent comply with other reasonable conditions as the court shall determine to be necessary or appropriate to ameliorate the conduct that gave rise to the filing of the petition or to prevent commitment to the Department of Juvenile Justice. SECTION 28. Section 63-19-1210 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 63-19-1210.  In accordance with the jurisdiction granted to the family court pursuant to Sections 63-3-510, 63-3-520, and 63-3-530, jurisdiction over a case involving a child must be transferred or retained as follows: (1) If, during the pendency of a criminal or quasi-criminal charge against a child in a circuit court of this State, it is ascertained that the child was under the age of eighteen years at the time of committing the alleged offense, it is the duty of the circuit court immediately to transfer the case, together with all the papers, documents, and testimony connected with it, to the family court of competent jurisdiction, except in those cases where the Constitution gives to the circuit court exclusive jurisdiction or in those cases where jurisdiction has properly been transferred to the circuit court by the family court under the provisions of this section. The court making the transfer shall order the child to be taken immediately to the place of detention designated by the court or to that court itself, or shall release the child to the custody of some suitable person to be brought before the court at a time designated. The court then shall proceed as provided in this chapter. The provisions of this section are applicable to all existing offenses and to offenses created in the future unless the General Assembly specifically directs otherwise. (2) Whenever a child is brought before a magistrate or city recorder and, in the opinion of the magistrate or city recorder, the child should be brought to the family court of competent jurisdiction under the provisions of this section, the magistrate or city recorder shall transfer the case to the family court and direct that the child involved be taken there. (3) When an action is brought in a circuit court which, in the opinion of the judge, falls within the jurisdiction of the family court, he may transfer the action upon his own motion or the motion of any party. (4) If a child seventeen years of age or older at the time of the alleged commission of the offense is charged with an offense which, if committed by an adult, would be a misdemeanor, a Class E or F felony as defined in Section 16-1-20, or a felony which provides for a maximum term of imprisonment of ten years or less, and if the court, after full investigation, considers it contrary to the best interest of the child or of the public to retain jurisdiction, the court, in its discretion, acting as committing magistrate, may bind over the child for proper criminal proceedings to a court which would have trial jurisdiction of the offense if committed by an adult. (5) If a child fourteen, fifteen, or who was sixteen years of age at the time of the alleged commission of the offense is charged with an offense which, if committed by an adult, would be a Class A, B, C, or D felony as defined in Section 16-1-20 or a felony which provides for a maximum term of imprisonment of fifteen years or more, the court, after full investigation and hearing, may determine it contrary to the best interest of the child or of the public to retain jurisdiction. The court, acting as committing magistrate, may bind over the child for proper criminal proceedings to a court which would have trial jurisdiction of the offenses if committed by an adult. (6) Within thirty days after the filing of a petition in the family court alleging the a child fifteen or sixteen years of age has committed the offense of murder or criminal sexual conduct, the person executing the petition may request in writing that the case be transferred to the court of general sessions with a view to proceeding against the child as a criminal rather than as a child coming within the purview of this chapter. The judge of the family court is authorized to determine this request. If the request is denied, the petitioner may appeal within five days to the circuit court. Upon the hearing of the appeal, the judge of the circuit court is vested with the discretion of exercising and asserting the jurisdiction of the court of general sessions or of relinquishing jurisdiction to the family court. If the circuit judge elects to exercise the jurisdiction of the general sessions court for trial of the case, he shall issue an order to that effect, and then the family court has no further jurisdiction in the matter. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for any child who has been charged with murder who was seventeen years of age or younger at the time of the alleged commission of the offense whose case is within or has been transferred to the jurisdiction of the general sessions court, the court may upon conviction sentence the child to a term of imprisonment less than the mandatory minimum sentence established under Section 16-3-20(A). (7) Once the family court relinquishes its jurisdiction over the child and the child is bound over to be treated as an adult, Section 63-19-2020 dealing with the confidentiality of identity and fingerprints does not apply. (8) When jurisdiction is relinquished by the family court in favor of another court, the court shall have full authority and power to grant bail, hold a preliminary hearing and any other powers as now provided by law for magistrates in such cases. (9) If a child fourteen sixteen years of age or older is charged with a violation of Section 16-23-430, Section 16-23-20, or Section 44-53-445, the court, after full investigation and hearing, if it considers it contrary to the best interest of the child or the public to retain jurisdiction, acting as committing magistrate, may bind over the child for proper criminal proceedings to a court which would have trial jurisdiction of the offenses if committed by an adult. (10) If a child fourteen sixteen years of age or older at the time of the alleged commission of the offense is charged with an offense which, if committed by an adult, provides for a term of imprisonment of ten years or more and the child previously has been adjudicated delinquent in family court or convicted in circuit court for two prior offenses which, if committed by an adult, provide for a term of imprisonment of ten years or more, the court, after full investigation and hearing, if it considers it contrary to the best interest of the child or the public to retain jurisdiction, acting as committing magistrate, may bind over the child for proper criminal proceedings to a court which would have trial jurisdiction of the offense if committed by an adult. For the purpose of this item, an adjudication or conviction is considered a second adjudication or conviction only if the date of the commission of the second offense occurred subsequent to the imposition of the sentence for the first offense. (11) The determination of the family court regarding whether the child is to be transferred or bound over to the court of general sessions is a final order, appealable to the Supreme Court. Both the petitioner and the child have a right of appeal. An appeal must be taken under the appellate rules governing criminal appeals. The appeal pursuant to this subsection must be heard and a determination must be made within one hundred twenty days from the filing of the appeal, absent exceptional circumstances justifying a longer time period. The South Carolina Supreme Court may create rules governing the procedures for the appeal within its rulemaking authority pursuant to Article V of the Constitution of South Carolina. SECTION 29. Section 63-19-1410 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 63-19-1410.  (A) When a child is found by decree of the court to be subject to this chapter, the court shall in its decree make a finding of the facts upon which the court exercises its jurisdiction over the child. Following the decree, the court shall enter the least restrictive appropriate disposition order from the following options in view of the seriousness of the delinquent act, such child's culpability as indicated by the circumstances of the particular case, the age of such child, such child's prior record, and such child's strengths and needs and by order may: (1) cause a child concerning whom a petition has been filed to be examined or treated by a physician, psychiatrist, or psychologist and for that purpose place the child in a hospital or other suitable facility; (2) order care and treatment as it considers best, except as otherwise provided in this section and may designate a state agency as the lead agency to provide a family assessment to the court. The assessment shall include, but is not limited to, the strengths and weaknesses of the family, problems interfering with the functioning of the family and with the best interests of the child, and recommendations for a comprehensive service plan to strengthen the family and assist in resolving these issues. The lead agency shall provide the family assessment to the court in a timely manner, and the court shall conduct a hearing to review the proposed plan and adopt a plan as part of its order that will best meet the needs and best interest of the child. In arriving at a comprehensive plan, the court shall consider: (a) additional testing or evaluation that may be needed; (b) economic services including, but not limited to, employment services, job training, food stamps, and aid to families with dependent children; (c) counseling services including, but not limited to, marital counseling, parenting skills, and alcohol and drug abuse counseling;  and (d) any other programs or services appropriate to the child's and family's needs. The lead agency is responsible for monitoring compliance with the court-ordered plan and shall report to the court as the court requires. In support of an order, the court may require the parents or other persons having custody of the child or any other person who has been found by the court to be encouraging, causing, or contributing to the acts or conditions which bring the child within the purview of this chapter to do or omit to do acts required or forbidden by law, when the judge considers the requirement necessary for the welfare of the child. In case of failure to comply with the requirement, the court may proceed against those persons for contempt of court; (3) place the child on probation or under supervision in the child's own home or in the custody of a suitable person elsewhere, upon conditions as the court may determine. (a) A child placed on probation by the court remains under the authority of the court only until the expiration of the specified term of the child's probation. This specified term of probation may presumptively shall not exceed two years for a felony offense or one year for a misdemeanor or status offense, but in no case may probation expire before but not extend after the twentieth birthday of the child. A child adjudicated delinquent for a probation violation or held in contempt for violation of a prior court order may be placed on probation for up to an additional six months. When a child is adjudicated for multiple offenses, the maximum term of probation shall be calculated based on the most severe adjudicated offense. The court may impose a longer term of probation if agreed to by the parties, or if a longer term is needed for the child to complete an evidence-based program as recommended by a clinical evaluation but in no case may probation extend after the child's twentieth birthday. (b) Probation means casework services during a continuance of the case. Probation must not be ordered or administered as punishment but as a measure for the protection, guidance, and well-being of the child and the child's family. Probation methods must be directed to the discovery and correction of the basic causes of maladjustment and to the development of the child's personality and character, with the aid of the social resources of the community. (c) As a condition of probation, the court may order the child to participate in a community mentor program as provided for in Section 63-19-1430. (d) The court may impose monetary restitution or participation in supervised work or community service, or both, as a condition of probation. Restitution presumptively shall not be ordered for any child who is under the age of sixteen at the time of the offense. To overcome this presumption, the state has a burden of proving, by a preponderance of the evidence, that the child has the ability to pay the restitution. The Department of Juvenile Justice, in coordination with local community agencies, shall develop and encourage employment of a constructive nature designed to make reparation and to promote the rehabilitation of the child. When considering the appropriate amount of monetary restitution to be ordered, the court shall establish the monetary loss suffered by the victim and then weigh and consider this amount against the number of individuals involved in causing the monetary loss, the child's particular role in causing this loss, and the child's ability to pay the amount over a reasonable period of time. The order for monetary restitution shall specify a monthly payment schedule that will result in full payment for the established amount of restitution by the end of the child's probationary period. In the absence of a monthly payment schedule, the Department of Juvenile Justice shall impose a payment schedule of equal monthly payments that will result in full restitution being paid by the end of the child's probationary period. If the court determines at a contempt of court hearing that the basis for holding the child in contempt is that the child has willfully failed to pay restitution, the court shall make specific findings on the record of the child's willful failure to pay and shall issue an order, other than a commitment order, that addresses the child's failure to pay. The Department of Juvenile Justice shall develop a system for the transferring of court-ordered restitution from the child to the victim or owner of property injured, destroyed, or stolen. As a condition of probation the court may impose upon the child a fine not exceeding two hundred dollars when the offense is one in which a magistrate, municipal, or circuit court judge has the authority to impose a fine. A fine may be imposed when commitment is suspended but not in addition to commitment; (e) If a child is ordered to complete drug screens as a condition of probation or during the community evaluation period and if the child's health insurance does not cover the costs of the drug screens, then the Department of Juvenile Justice shall pay for the drug screens or administer them at their local offices at no charge for the child. A child must not be required to pay for drug screens as part of any court order. (4) order the child to participate in a community mentor program as provided in Section 63-19-1430; (5) commit the child to the custody or to the guardianship of a public or private institution or agency authorized to care for children or to place them in family homes or under the guardianship of a suitable person. Commitment must be for an indeterminate period but in no event beyond the child's twenty-second birthday. Such commitment only may be ordered subject to the commitment limitations established by Section 63 19 1440; (6) require that a child under twelve years of age who is adjudicated delinquent for an offense listed in Section 23-3-430(C) be given appropriate psychiatric or psychological treatment to address the circumstances of the offense for which the child was adjudicated;  and (7) place a child on administrative supervision with the Department of Juvenile Justice for a period of up to one year in order to pay restitution calculated pursuant to subitem (A)(3)(d), or complete community service or other sanction. Administrative supervision is not probation, and administrative supervision terminates automatically upon completion of the ordered sanction or sanctions; and (7)(8) dismiss the petition or otherwise terminate its the court's jurisdiction at any time on the motion of either party or on its own motion. (B) Whenever the court commits a child to an institution or agency, it shall transmit with the order of commitment a summary of its information concerning the child, and the institution or agency shall give to the court information concerning the child which that the court may require. Counsel of record, if any, must be notified by the court of an adjudication under this section, and in the event there is no counsel of record, the child or the child's parents or guardian must be notified of the adjudication by regular mail from the court to the last address of the child or the child's parents or guardian. (C) No adjudication by the court of the status of a child is a conviction, nor does the adjudication operate to impose civil disabilities ordinarily resulting from conviction, nor may a child be charged with crime or convicted in a court, except as provided in Section 63-19-1210(6). The disposition made of a child or any evidence given in court does not disqualify the child in a future civil service application or appointment. SECTION 30.Article 13, Chapter 19, Title 63 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 63-19-1415.  (A) Each Circuit Solicitor may operate one or more specialty treatment court programs, such as a Juvenile Drug Court or a Juvenile Mental Health Court, if authorized by the South Carolina Supreme Court. (B) Such specialty treatment court programs are to be operated in accordance with national guidelines and evidence-based research. (C) When a child is charged with an offense which places him under the jurisdiction of the family court and the child has substance abuse or mental health issues, the child may be referred to a specialty treatment court program. Upon successful completion of the specialty treatment court program, the proceedings in the family court must be dismissed and the record of the child's offenses for which the child participated in the program must be automatically expunged at no charge to the child. (D) The participation in the specialty treatment court program shall be voluntary and a child must not be ordered to participate in such program against his will. SECTION 31. Section 63-19-1440 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 63-19-1440.  See Editor's Note for contingency. (A) A child, after the child's twelfth birthday and before the child's eighteenth birthday or while under the jurisdiction of the family court for disposition of an a criminal offense that occurred prior to the child's eighteenth birthday or for conduct that is a violation of probation or an act of contempt of court where the prior order of probation or court order arose from an adjudication for a criminal offense, may be committed to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice which shall arrange for placement in a suitable corrective environment. Children under the age of twelve years may be committed only to the custody of the department which shall arrange for placement in a suitable corrective environment other than institutional confinement. NoA child under the age of eighteen years may be committed or sentenced to any other penal or correctional institution of this State. (B) A child may be committed to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice as provided below if: (1) the child has a current adjudication for an offense which would be an A, B, C, or D felony if committed by an adult; (2) the child has a current adjudication for an offense which would be a misdemeanor if committed by an adult and one or more of the following apply: (a) the current adjudicated offense involved the use of a firearm, as defined in section 16-23-490(D); or (b) the child has had at least one prior adjudication for an offense that would be a felony if committed by an adult and at least three other prior adjudications for a delinquent act; or (3)(a) the child is petitioned for an offense which would be a felony if committed by an adult; (b) the child is adjudicated for an offense which is a lesser included offense to the petitioned felony offense; and (c) the parties agree that a commitment is in the child's best interest. In any case in which the court commits the child to the custody of the department, the court shall issue individualized written findings as to why a less restrictive disposition option would not adequately protect the public or rehabilitate the child. For the purposes of this section, an adjudication is considered a prior adjudication only if the date of the commission of the subsequent offense or delinquent act occurred after the imposition of the sentence for the prior offense or delinquent act. (C) A child must not be committed to the Department of Juvenile Justice for a status offense, or any violation of a court order related to a status offense. A child who is determined by the court to have violated the conditions of probation set forth by the court in an order issued as a result of the child's adjudication of delinquency for a status offense may not be committed to the Department of Juvenile Justice. (B)(D) All commitments to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice for delinquency as opposed to the conviction of a specific crime may be made only for the reasons and in the manner prescribed in Sections 63-3-510, 63-3-520, 63-3-580, 63-3-600, 63-3-650, and this chapter, with evaluations made and proceedings conducted only by the judges authorized to order commitments in this section. When a child is committed to the custody of the department, commitment must be for the court must order: (1) an indeterminate sentence, not extending beyond the twenty-second birthday of the child unless sooner released by the department, or; (2) for a determinate commitment sentence not to exceed ninety days. (3) if the child is adjudicated delinquent for an offense which provides for a maximum term of imprisonment of fifteen years or more if committed by an adult, the court may order the child committed for a determinate sentence not to exceed one hundred eighty days. If a child is subject to a disposition order for more than one adjudicated offense, then the child may not be committed for consecutive determinate commitment sentences when the total length of the determinate commitment would be for longer than the minimum parole guideline as established by the release authority, pursuant to Article 17 of this Title, if the child were to be committed to the Department of Juvenile Justice for an indeterminate period of time. A child adjudicated delinquent for a violation of a probation order or held in contempt of court for a violation of a court order related to a misdemeanor or felony offense must not receive an indeterminate commitment sentence but may receive a determinate commitment sentence not to exceed seventy-two hours, when the child has at least one prior adjudication for a probation violation or contempt of court. Prior to the issuance of a determinate commitment sentence of up to seventy-two hours for a violation of probation or contempt of court, the court must make a finding on the record that less restrictive alternatives have been considered and are unavailable or inappropriate or that the child has already been ordered to comply with a less restrictive alternative sanction but failed to comply with the sanction. (C)(E)(1) The court, before committing a child as a delinquent or as a part of a sentence including commitments for contempt, shall order a community evaluation or temporarily commit the child to the Department of Juvenile Justice for not more than forty-fivethirty days for evaluation subject to the exceptions listed below. A community evaluation is equivalent to a residential evaluation, but it is not required to include all components of a residential evaluation. However, in either evaluation the department shall make a recommendation to the court on the appropriate disposition of the case and shall submit that recommendation to the court before final disposition. The department is authorized to allow any child adjudicated delinquent for a status offense, a misdemeanor offense, or violation of probation or contempt for any offense who is temporarily committed to the department's custody for a residential evaluation, to reside in that child's home or in his home community while undergoing a community evaluation, unless the committing judge finds and concludes in the order for evaluation, that a community evaluation of the child must not be conducted because the child presents an unreasonable flight or public safety risk to his home community. (2) The court may waive in writing the evaluation of the child and proceed to issue final disposition in the case if the child: (1)(a) has previously received a residential evaluation or a community evaluation and the evaluation is available to the court; (2)(b) has been within the past year temporarily or finally discharged or conditionally released for parole from a correctional institution of the department, and the child's previous evaluation or other equivalent information is available to the court; or (3)(c) receives a determinate commitment sentence not to exceed ninety days. (D)(F) When a juvenile child is adjudicated delinquent or convicted of a crime or has entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere in a court authorized to commit to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice, the juvenile child may be committed for an indeterminate period until the juvenile child has reached age twenty-two or until sooner released by the releasing entity or released by order of a judge of the Supreme Court or the circuit court of this State, rendered at chambers or otherwise, in a proceeding in the nature of an application for a writ of habeas corpus. A juvenile child who has not been paroled or otherwise released from the custody of the department by the juvenile's child's nineteenth birthday must be transferred to the custody and authority of the Youthful Offender Division of the Department of Corrections. If not sooner released by the releasing entity, the juvenile child must be released by age twenty-two according to the provisions of the juvenile's child's commitment;  however, notwithstanding the above provision, any juvenile child committed as an adult offender by order of the court of general sessions must be considered for parole or other release according to the laws pertaining to release of adult offenders. (E)(G) A juvenile child committed to the Department of Juvenile Justice following an adjudication for a violent offense contained in Section 16-1-60 or for the offense of assault and battery of a high and aggravated nature, who has not been paroled or released from the custody of the department by his eighteenth birthday must be transferred to the custody and authority of the Youthful Offender Division of the Department of Corrections. A juvenile child who has not been paroled or released from the custody of the department by his nineteenth birthday must be transferred to the custody and authority of the Youthful Offender Division of the Department of Corrections at age nineteen. If not released sooner by the Board of Juvenile Parole, a juvenile child transferred pursuant to this subsection must be released by his twenty-second birthday according to the provisions of his commitment. Notwithstanding the above provision, a juvenile child committed as an adult offender by order of the court of general sessions must be considered for parole or other release according to the laws pertaining to release of adult offenders. (F) Notwithstanding subsections (A) and (E), a child may be committed to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice or to a secure evaluation center operated by the department for a determinate period not to exceed ninety days when: (1) the child has been adjudicated delinquent by a family court judge for a status offense, as defined in Section 63-19-20, excluding truancy, and the order acknowledges that the child has been afforded all due process rights guaranteed to a child offender; (2) the child is in contempt of court for violation of a court order to attend school or an order issued as a result of the child's adjudication of delinquency for a status offense, as defined in Section 63-19-20;  or (3) the child is determined by the court to have violated the conditions of probation set forth by the court in an order issued as a result of the child's adjudication of delinquency for a status offense, as defined in Section 63-19-20 including truancy. Orders issued pursuant to this subsection must acknowledge: (a) that the child has been advised of all due process rights afforded to a child offender;  and (b) that the court has received information from the appropriate state or local agency or public entity that has reviewed the facts and circumstances causing the child to be before the court. (G)(H) A child committed under this section may not be confined with a child who has been determined by the department to be violent. (H)(I) After having served at least two-thirds of the time ordered by a court, a child committed to the Department of Juvenile Justice for a determinate period pursuant to this section may be released by the department prior to the expiration of the determinate period for "good behavior" as determined by the department. The court, in its discretion, may state in the order that the child is not to be released prior to the expiration of the determinate period ordered by the court. (I)(J) Juveniles Children detained in any temporary holding facility or juvenile detention center, short-term alternative placement or its equivalent, or who are temporarily committed for evaluation to a Department of Juvenile Justice evaluation center for the offense for which they were subsequently committed by the family court to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice shall receive credit toward their parole guidelines, if indeterminately sentenced, or credit toward their date of release, if determinately sentenced, for each day they are detained in or temporarily committed to any secure pre-dispositional facility, center, or program. SECTION 32. Section 63-19-1450(A) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (A) No juvenile child may be committed to an institution under the control of the Department of Juvenile Justice who is seriously handicapped by mental illness or retardation intellectual disability. (a) The Family Court may order an evaluation for a determination of serious mental illness or intellectual disability sua sponte or upon a motion of any party involved with the case or upon a recommendation from the Department of Juvenile Justice pursuant to Section 44-24-150(A) and (B) or Section 44-20-450. (b) Upon the return of the evaluation the court must hold a hearing to determine whether to proceed pursuant to Section 44-24-150(C), Section 44-20-450 or under Title 63 to determine if the child meets the definition of seriously handicapped by mental illness or intellectual disability and whether the child must be committed to the supervision of the Department of Mental Health or the Department of Disabilities and Special Needs. In making the determination the court shall consider, in addition to any evaluation ordered by the court or requested by the parties, the child's past mental health, disability services, special education or similar records provided by any of the parties to determine if this section applies. (2) If, after a juvenile child is referred to the Reception and Evaluation Center custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice, it is determined that the juvenile child is mentally ill, as defined in Section 44-23-10, or a person with intellectual disability to an extent that the juvenile child could not be properly cared for in its custody, the department through the voluntary admission process or by instituting necessary legal action may accomplish the transfer of the juvenile child to another state agency which in its judgment is best qualified to care for the juvenile child in accordance with the laws of this State. This legal action pursuant to Section 63-3-510(A)(2) must be brought in the juvenile's child's resident county. The department shall establish standards with regard to the physical and mental health of juveniles children whom it can accept for commitment. SECTION 33.Article 13, Chapter 19, Title 63 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 63-19-1480.  (A) Any case remaining open for twelve months after the date of the disposition shall be reviewed by the court at least annually and closed, unless the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that the continued provision of services and court involvement are necessary and shall be fruitful to rehabilitate the child or protect the public interest. Upon making a finding that the purposes of this chapter have been met with regard to the child named in the petition, or for such other reason the court may consider appropriate and consistent with the purposes of this chapter, the court may order a case closed. If after the hearing, the court does not close the case, then the court may amend earlier dispositional orders when supported by developments since the issuance of such orders. All such findings shall be in writing and shall include the individualized basis upon which those findings were made. (B) Upon request by the child, the solicitor, or the Department of Juvenile Justice, the court shall also review any case in which the child remains at the Department of Juvenile Justice more than six months after an order of commitment without having been released on parole or having been returned to the Department's custody following revocation of parole, and may amend earlier dispositional orders at such hearings. Successive requests for review shall be granted upon request by the child, the solicitor, or the Department of Juvenile Justice, but the court may deny such requests without a hearing if a review was held less than ninety days prior to receipt of a request for review. Any such request for review by the court shall be decided within forty-five days of the filing of that request. In each instance that the court reviews a case in which the child remains at the Department or remains under the supervision of the Department at the time of review, the child shall be entitled to the assistance of counsel. SECTION 34. Section 63-19-1810(A) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (A) The release and revocation of release of juveniles children adjudicated delinquent and committed to the department must be determined by: (1) the department for juveniles children adjudicated delinquent and committed after March 31, 2007, for an indeterminate period for a status offense or a misdemeanor, other than assault and battery of a high and aggravated nature or assault with intent to kill, and for juveniles children who have violated probation for a status offense or a misdemeanor, other than assault and battery of a high and aggravated nature or assault with intent to kill; (2) the Board of Juvenile Parole for juveniles children adjudicated delinquent and committed for an offense other than an offense provided for in item (1). SECTION 35. Section 63-19-1820 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 63-19-1820.  (A)(1) The Board of Juvenile Parole shall meet monthly and at other times as may be necessary to review the records and progress of juveniles committed to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice for the purpose of deciding the release or revocation of release of these juveniles. The board shall make periodic inspections, at least quarterly, of the records of these juveniles and may issue temporary and final discharges or release these juveniles conditionally and prescribe conditions for release into aftercare. Before a juvenile is conditionally released, the juvenile must agree in writing to be subject to search or seizure, without a search warrant, with or without cause, of the juvenile's person, any vehicle the juvenile owns or is driving, and any of the juvenile's possessions by: (a) the juvenile's aftercare counselor; (b) any probation agent employed by the Department of Probation, Parole and Pardon Services;  or (c) any other law enforcement officer. A juvenile may not be conditionally released by the parole board if he fails to comply with this provision. However, a juvenile who was adjudicated delinquent of a Class C misdemeanor or an unclassified misdemeanor that carries a term of imprisonment of not more than one year may not be required to agree to be subject to search or seizure, without a search warrant, with or without cause, of the juvenile's person, any vehicle the juvenile owns or is driving, or any of the juvenile's possessions. Immediately before each search or seizure conducted pursuant to this item, the law enforcement officer seeking to conduct the search or seizure must verify with the Department of Probation, Parole and Pardon Services or by any other means available to the officer that the individual upon whom the search or seizure will be conducted is currently on parole or probation or that the individual is currently subject to the provisions of his conditional release. A law enforcement officer conducting a search or seizure without a warrant pursuant to this item shall report to the law enforcement agency that employs him all of these searches or seizures, which shall include the name, address, age, gender, and race or ethnicity of the person that is the subject of the search or seizure. The law enforcement agency shall submit this information at the end of each month to the Department of Probation, Parole and Pardon Services for review of abuse. A finding of abuse of the use of searches or seizures without a search warrant must be reported by the Department of Probation, Parole and Pardon Services to the State Law Enforcement Division for investigation. If the law enforcement officer fails to report each search or seizure pursuant to this item, he is subject to discipline pursuant to the employing agency's policies and procedures. (2)(a) It is the right of a juvenile who has not committed a violent offense, as defined by Section 16-1-60, and for whom the board is the releasing entity, to appear personally before the board every three months for the purpose of parole consideration, but no appearance may begin until the board determines that an appropriate period of time has elapsed since the juvenile's commitment. (b) The board may waive the quarterly review of juveniles committed to the department, for whom the board is the releasing entity, for the commission of a violent crime, as defined in Section 16-1-60, until the juvenile reaches the minimum parole guidelines the board establishes for the juvenile. At that point, the board may schedule its first review of the juvenile from three months up to twelve months after the juvenile reaches the minimum parole guidelines established by the board. The scheduling of subsequent reviews is in the discretion of the board but must occur within three to twelve months of the juvenile's last appearance. (3) In order to allow reviews and appearances by juveniles, for whom the board is the releasing entity, the board may assign the members or individuals to meet in panels of not less than three members or individuals, to receive progress reports and recommendations, review cases, meet with juveniles, meet with counselors, and to hear matters and consider cases for release, parole, and parole revocation. Membership on these panels must be periodically rotated on a random basis. At the meetings of the panels, a unanimous vote must be considered the final decision. A panel vote that is not unanimous must not be considered as a final decision, and the matter must be referred to the full parole board, which shall determine the matter by a majority vote of its membership. (4) The board may conduct parole hearings by means of a two-way, closed circuit television system. (5) The board shall develop written guidelines for the consideration of parole release of juveniles committed to the department for offenses for which the parole board is the releasing entity. The board shall provide these guidelines to juveniles, for whom the board is the releasing entity, upon commitment and periodically reviewed with each juvenile to assess the progress made toward achieving release on parole. (B) In the cases of juveniles for whom the department is the releasing entity, the department shall establish policies and procedures governing the review and release procedures for these juveniles. (C) In the determination of the type of discharges or conditional releases granted, the releasing entity shall consider the interests of the person involved and the interests of society and shall employ the services of and consult with the personnel of the Department of Juvenile Justice. The releasing entity may from time to time modify the conditions of discharges or conditional releases previously granted. (D) The releasing entity shall ensure that length of stay guidelines are based on evidence-based best practices and that the balance of public safety, personal accountability, and competency development are accounted for in length of stay decisions and plans. The projected release date for a committed child must be based on the severity of the committing offense and the child's risk for reoffending. The actual release date may take into consideration other factors, including the child's progress in treatment and behavior during commitment. SECTION 36. Section 63-19-1835 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 63-19-1835.  (A) The department may grant up to a ten-day reduction of the probationary or parole term to probationers and parolees who are under the department's supervision for each month they are compliant with the terms and conditions of their probation or parole order. (B) Except for an alleged community safety violation, in response to an alleged technical violation of the terms and conditions of a child's probationary or parole term the department must serve on the child a notice of administrative sanctions as an alternative to pursuing a probation violation or parole revocation. Prior to implementation of administrative sanctions, the child and the child's parent or guardian must agree in writing to the additional conditions set forth in the notice of administrative sanctions. Once the notice of administrative sanctions is signed, these additional conditions are considered to be incorporated as part of the original probation or parole order, and the department shall file a copy of the notice of administrative sanctions with the court or parole authority. The criteria for administering structured, community-based administrative sanctions shall be established by policy of the department. The department shall delineate in the policy a listing of administrative sanctions for the most common types of supervision violations including, but not limited to: failure to report; failure to pay restitution; failure to participate in a required program or service; failure to comply with mandatory school attendance order or order to refrain from engaging in misconduct resulting in school disciplinary referrals; failure to complete community service; failure to follow curfew or the conditions of electronic monitoring; failure to successfully complete an alternative placement program; and failure to refrain from the use of alcohol or controlled substances. The sanctions shall consider the severity of the current violation, the child's previous juvenile record, the number and severity of previous supervision violations, the child's risk and needs assessment, the child's age and developmental level, the child's mental health diagnosis or other special needs, the extent to which administrative sanctions were imposed for previous violations, and other relevant factors. The department, in determining the administrative sanctions to be served on a child, shall ascertain the availability of community-based programs and treatment options including, but not limited to: inpatient and outpatient substance abuse treatment facilities, individual and family counseling, mentoring programs, day or night reporting centers, intensive supervision, electronic monitoring, community service, programs to reduce recidivism, and other community based options consistent with evidence-based best practices. Nothing in this section precludes the department from responding immediately to an alleged community safety violation by initiating violation proceedings with the appropriate authority. SECTION 37. Section 63-19-2020(E) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (E)(1) The department must notify the principal of a school or the administration of the college or university in which a child is enrolled, intends to be enrolled, or was last enrolled upon final disposition of a case in which the child is charged with any of the following offenses: (a) a violent crime, as defined in Section 16-1-60; (b) a crime in which a weapon, as defined in Section 59-63-370, was used; (c) assault and battery against school personnel, as defined in Section 16-3-612; (d)(c) assault and battery of a high and aggravated nature or assault and battery in the first or second degree committed on school grounds or at a school-sponsored event against any person affiliated with the school in an official capacity;  or (e)(d) distribution or trafficking in unlawful drugs, as defined in Article 3, Chapter 53 of Title 44. (2) Each school district, college, or university  is responsible for developing a policy for schools within the district each school to follow to ensure that the confidential nature of a child offense history and other information received is maintained. This policy must provide for, but is not limited to: (a) the retention of the child offense history and other information relating to the child offense history in the child's school disciplinary file or in some other confidential location; (b) the destruction of the child offense history upon the child's completion of secondary school, the completion or withdrawal from college or university, or upon reaching twenty-one years of age;  and (c) limiting access to the child's school disciplinary file to school personnel. This access must only occur when necessary and appropriate to meet and adequately address the educational needs of the child. SECTION 38. Section 63-19-2030(E) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (E)(1) Incident reports in which a child is the subject are to be provided to the victim of a crime pursuant to Section 16-3-1520. (2) Incident reports, including information identifying a child, must be provided by law enforcement to the principal of the school, or the administration of the college or university in which the child is enrolled when the child has been charged with any of the following offenses: (1)(a) a violent crime, as defined in Section 16-1-60; (2)(b)an offense that would carry a maximum term of imprisonment of fifteen years or more if committed by an adult; (3)(c) a crime in which a weapon, as defined in Section 59-63-370, was used; (4) assault and battery against school personnel, as defined in Section 16-3-612; (5)(d) assault and battery of a high and aggravated nature or assault and battery in  the first or second degree committed on school grounds or at a school-sponsored event against any person affiliated with the school in an official capacity;  or (6)(e) distribution or trafficking in unlawful drugs, as defined in Article 3, Chapter 53 of Title 44. (3) Incident reports involving other offenses must be provided upon request of the principal or the president of the college or university. This information must be maintained by the principal or the president of the college or university in the manner set forth in Section 63-19-2020(E) and must be forwarded with the child's permanent school records if the child transfers to another school or school district. (4) Any disclosures made pursuant to subitem (E)(2) must include language clarifying that the child is innocent until proven guilty, and that once the charges are finally adjudicated by the family court, the school may make school assignment decisions based only on the adjudication and not on pending charges. (5) If law enforcement has made a disclosure pursuant to Section 63-19-2030(E), then it must supplement that notification with timely notification of any dismissal or reduction of any of the notified charges. SECTION 39. Section 63-19-2050 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 63-19-2050.  (A)(1) A person who has been taken into custody for, charged with, or adjudicated delinquent for having committed a status offense or a nonviolent crime, as defined in Section 16-1-70, may petition the court for an order expunging all official records relating to: (a) being taken into custody; (b) the charges filed against the person; (c) the adjudication;  and (d) the disposition. (2) A person may not petition the court if the person has a prior adjudication for an offense that would carry a maximum term of imprisonment of five years or more if committed by an adult. (B) A prosecution or law enforcement agency may file an objection to the expungement. If an objection is filed, the expungement must be heard by the court. The prosecution or law enforcement agency's reason for objecting must be that the person has other charges pending or the charges are not eligible for expungement. The prosecution or law enforcement agency shall notify the person of the objection. The notice must be given in writing at the most current address on file with the court, or through the person's counsel of record. (C)(1) If the person has been taken into custody for, charged with, or adjudicated delinquent for having committed a status offense, the court shall grant the expungement order. If the person has been taken into custody for, charged with, or adjudicated delinquent for having committed multiple status offenses, the court may grant an expungement order for the multiple status offenses. All official records relating to the taking into custody, the charges filed, the adjudication, and the disposition for committing a status offense, as defined in Section 63-19-20, must be expunged subject to eligibility when the person has reached the age of eighteen. The expungements must occur if the person has no family court delinquency cases pending or family court delinquency sentences to be completed, or as soon thereafter once the person has completed the sentence for any pending cases, the service of any pending dispositional sentences imposed by the family court including probation or parole, or upon the final conclusion of any pending case in the family court if there is a dismissal, a finding of no delinquency, or no sentence is imposed. The expungements must occur after appropriate eligibility verifications upon the earliest of the following: (a) after notice or written request by the eligible child; (b) after a regular quarterly system wide check of children in the system eligible to receive an expungement; or (c) if technology allows within a jurisdiction, the review for eligibility must occur automatically upon each eligible child's eighteenth birthday. (2) If the person has been taken into custody for, charged with, or adjudicated delinquent for having committed a nonviolent crime, as defined in Section 16-1-70, the court may grant the expungement order. For the purpose of this section, any number of offenses for which the individual received youthful offender sentences at a single sentencing proceeding for offenses that are closely connected and arose out of the same incident may be considered as one offense and treated as one conviction for expungement purposes. (3) The court shall not grant the expungement order unless the court finds that the person is at least eighteen years of age, has successfully completed any dispositional sentence imposed, has not been subsequently adjudicated for or convicted of any criminal offense, and does not have any criminal charges pending in family court or general sessions court. If the person was found not guilty in an adjudicatory hearing in the family court or the charge was dismissed, the court shall grant the expungement order regardless of the person's age and the person must not be charged a fee for the expungement. An adjudication for a violent crime, as defined in Section 16-1-60, must not be expunged. (D) If the expungement order is granted by the court, the records must be destroyed or retained by any law enforcement agency or municipal, county, state agency, or department pursuant to the provisions of Section 17-1-40. (E) The effect of the expungement order is to restore the person in the contemplation of the law to the status the person occupied before being taken into custody. No person to whom the expungement order has been entered may be held thereafter under any provision of law to be guilty of perjury or otherwise giving false statement by reason of failing to recite or acknowledge the charge or adjudication in response to an inquiry made of the person for any purpose. (F) For purposes of this section, an adjudication is considered a previous adjudication only if the adjudication occurred prior to the date the subsequent offense was committed. (G) The judge, at the time of adjudication, shall notify the person of the person's ability to have the person's record expunged, the conditions that must be met, as well as the process for receiving an expungement in the particular jurisdiction pursuant to this section. (H) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an individual who is qualified to petition for record destruction under this section may not be charged a fee to petition for or obtain an order for record destruction, or for any part of the process for adjudicating such a petition SECTION 40.Article 19, Chapter 18, Title 59 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 59-18-1970.  (A) For purposes of this section, "a student who has experienced a disruption in the student's education" means a student who experiences one or more changes in public school or school district enrollment during a single school year as the result of: (1) homelessness, as defined in the federal McKinney Vento Homeless Assistance Act and as determined by the public school or school district; (2) adjudication as: (a) a victim of child abuse or neglect, pursuant to Chapter 7, Title 63; or (b) having committed a status offense or an act which, if committed by an adult, would be a crime, pursuant to Chapter 19 of Title 63; or (3) placement in a mental health treatment facility or habilitation program for developmental disabilities. (B) If a student who has experienced a disruption in the student's education transfers to a new public school or school district, then the receiving public school or school district shall communicate with the sending public school or school district within two business days of the student's enrollment. The sending public school or school district shall provide the receiving public school or school district with any requested records within two business days of having received the receiving public school's or school district's communication. (C) A student who has experienced a disruption in the student's education because of transferring to a new public school as the result of circumstances set forth in this section shall have: (1) priority placement in classes that meet state graduation requirements; (2) timely placement in elective classes that are comparable to those in which the student was enrolled at the student's previous public school or schools as soon as the public school or school district receives verification from the student's records; (3) equal access to participation in sports and other extracurricular activities, career and technical programs or other special programs for which the student qualifies; (4) timely assistance and advice from counselors to improve the student's college or career readiness; and (5) all special education services to which the student is entitled. SECTION 41.Article 19, Chapter 18, Title 59 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 59-18-1980.  (A) As used in this section, "involved in the juvenile justice system" means a student who has been referred to the Department of Juvenile Justice or the family court due to allegations that the student has committed a delinquent or status offense and voluntary or involuntary conditions have been imposed on the student, including a student who is participating in a diversion program, is under a probation order, is currently supervised by the Department of Juvenile Justice, or has recently entered or left a juvenile or criminal justice placement or is on supervised release or parole. (B) Each school district and charter school authorized by the Charter School Board or a local school board shall designate an individual to serve as a point of contact for students involved in the juvenile justice system. Charter schools authorized by school districts may use the district's point of contact. Multiple school districts may share a single designated point of contact with approval from the Department of Education and from the Department of Juvenile Justice. (C) For students transferring into the school district or charter school, the point of contact person shall be responsible for: (1) ensuring that a student is immediately enrolled regardless of whether the records normally required for enrollment are produced by the last school the student attended or by the student; (2) ensuring that the enrolling school communicates with the last school attended by a transferring student to obtain relevant academic and other records within two business days of the student's enrollment; (3) ensuring that the enrolling school performs a timely transfer of credits that the student earned in the last school attended; and (4) collaborating with the education program staff in a juvenile or criminal justice placement, the child, and the child's parent, guardian, or other legal educational decision maker to develop and implement a plan for assisting the transition of a student to the school district or charter school authorized by the department to minimize disruption to the student's education. (D) For students transferring out of the school district or charter school authorized by the department, the point of contact person shall be responsible for providing all records to the new school within two business days of receiving a request from the receiving school. (E) For students involved in the juvenile justice system, the point of contact person shall be responsible for: (1) ensuring that a student has equal opportunity to participate in sports and other extracurricular activities, career and technical programs or other special programs for which the student qualifies; (2) ensuring that a student in high school receives timely and ongoing assistance and advice from counselors to improve the student's college and career readiness; (3) ensuring that a student receives all special education services and accommodations to which the student is entitled under state and federal law; (4) identifying school staff at each school site who can ensure that students are appropriately supported throughout their enrollment; (5) supporting communication among the school; the Department of Social Services; the student; the student's parent or guardian; the student's educational decision maker appointed by the children's court; caregivers; and other supportive individuals that the student identifies to ensure that the responsibilities listed in this subsection are implemented; and (6) ensuring that other school staff and teachers have access to training and resources about the educational challenges and needs of system involved youth, including trauma informed practices and the impact of trauma on learning. (F) The Department of Social Services shall notify a school when a student in the school enters foster care or a student in foster care enrolls in another school. (G) The student or the student's educational decision maker may notify a school that the student is involved in the juvenile justice system to obtain support and services from the point of contact. SECTION 42. Section 59-24-60 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 59-24-60.  In addition to other provisions required by law or by regulation of the State Board of Education, school administrators must contact law enforcement authorities immediately upon notice that a person is engaging or has engaged in activities on school property or at a school sanctioned or sponsored activity which, may result or if committed by an adult, would be a felony or a crime punishable by a maximum sentence of five years or more of incarceration or which results in injury or serious threat of injury to the person or to another person or his property as defined in local board policy. SECTION 43. Section 59-63-210 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 59-63-210. (A) Any district board of trustees may authorize or order the expulsion, suspension, or transfer of any pupil for the commission of any crime act which if committed by an adult would be a felony or a crime punishable by a maximum term of imprisonment of five years or more, any violation related to a threat of violence to the school or any person at the school, any act for which there a victim who attends the school who has a reasonable fear for his safety, gross immorality, gross misbehavior, persistent disobedience, or for violation of written rules and promulgated regulations established by the district board, county board, or the State Board of Education, or when the presence of the pupil is detrimental to the best interest of the school. If the action by the district board of trustees is based on conduct by the student that occurred outside of school or school sanctioned or sponsored activity, then such action is permitted only when the conduct at issue amounts to a violent offense as defined in Section 16-1-60 or resulted in moderate or great bodily injury. Each expelled pupil has the right to petition for readmission for the succeeding school year. Expulsion or suspension must be construed to prohibit a pupil from entering the school or school grounds, except for a prearranged conference with an administrator, attending any day or night school functions, or riding a school bus. The provisions of this section do not preclude enrollment and attendance in any adult or night school. (B) A district board of trustees shall not authorize or order the expulsion, suspension, or transfer of any pupil for a violation of Section 59-150-250(B). SECTION 44. Section 59-63-1320 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 59-63-1320.  Eligible alternative school programs shall be provided for, but not limited to, students in grades 6-12 as follows: (1) Students referred for voluntary attendance at the alternative school program and meeting the district criteria to attend based upon a documented need for the attention and assistance beyond that of a traditional program as established by the academic history of the student, including the student's academic plan as required in Section 59-18-500, and following other policies and procedures for documenting need established by the district board of trustees. (2) Students referred for voluntary attendance at the alternative school program and meeting the district criteria to attend based upon a documented need for the program due to habitual exhibitions of disruptive behavior in violation of the student conduct policies and behavior codes approved by the school board of trustees. (3) Districts must establish clear guidelines and procedures for the referral of any student into an alternative school program and before a decision is made to assign a student to an alternative school program, a determination must be made that the written and distributed academic and disciplinary policies of the district have been followed. (3)(4) Students placed in an alternative school program by the district board of trustees as an option to suspension or expulsion or by the dispositive order of a family court judge, with the consent of the local board of trustees. However, before a student may be placed in an alternative school program, a determination must be made by the local board that the written and distributed disciplinary policy of the district has been followed. Districts must establish clear guidelines and procedures for the placement of any student into an alternative school program and at a minimum they shall prescribe due process procedures for placement actions. (5) When a child who has been enrolled in a Department of Juvenile Justice school district leaves the Department's school district and enrolls or re enrolls in a school district, the district must not require that student to attend alternative school programs unless: (a) a student is referred for voluntary attendance at the alternative school program and an intervention team, including parent or guardian and child, agrees such placement is appropriate; (b) an intervention assessment reveals an imminent threat of injury or a likelihood of serious misconduct that exceeds routine discipline matters will occur if the child remains or reenrolls at his assigned school; or (c) if the child or the child's parent or guardian objects to the placement in an alternative school, a due process hearing must be held by the district within ten business days and there must be a determination by the hearing officer that the student would be better served in the alternative setting based on clear guidelines and procedures for placement established by the school district. (6) When students are being considered for placement in an alternative school program, districts must consider the requirements of the Federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (IDEA). If a child with a disability for purposes of the IDEA who has been in the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice leaves the Department's custody and enrolls or re enrolls in a school district, then the district must hold a team meeting to determine on an individualized basis the child's most appropriate educational placement. (7) If a student placed by the board of trustees in an alternative school program enrolls in another school district before the expiration of the period of placement, the board of trustees of the district requiring the placement shall provide to the district in which the student enrolls, at the same time other records of the student are provided, information concerning the student's placement in an alternative school program. Upon review of the information, the district in which the student enrolls may continue an alternative education program placement or may allow the student to attend regular classes without completing the period of the placement. SECTION 45.Sections 63-19-2420 and 63-19-2430 of the S.C. Code are repealed. SECTION 46. The General Assembly finds that all the provisions contained in this act relate to one subject as required by Section 17, Article III of the South Carolina Constitution, 1895, in that each provision relates directly to or in conjunction with other sections to the subject of juvenile justice reform as recommended by the Senate Select Committee on Raise the Age. The General Assembly further finds that a common purpose or relationship exists among the sections, representing a potential plurality but not disunity of topics, notwithstanding that reasonable minds might differ in identifying more than one topic contained in this act. SECTION 47. The repeal or amendment by this act of any law, whether temporary or permanent or civil or criminal, does not affect pending actions, rights, duties, or liabilities founded thereon, or alter, discharge, release or extinguish any penalty, forfeiture, or liability incurred under the repealed or amended law, unless the repealed or amended provision shall so expressly provide. After the effective date of this act, all laws repealed or amended by this act must be taken and treated as remaining in full force and effect for the purpose of sustaining any pending or vested right, civil action, special proceeding, criminal prosecution, or appeal existing as of the effective date of this act, and for the enforcement of rights, duties, penalties, forfeitures, and liabilities as they stood under the repealed or amended laws. SECTION 48. This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----